Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska66-1511
Refiner, defined.

Refiner shall mean any person who refines, prepares, blends, distills, manufactures, or compounds petroleum in Nebraska for such person's own use in this state or for sale or delivery in this state.

Laws 1989, LB 289, § 11.